Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.070

Services to students of preschool age with disabilities—Apportionment—Allocations from state excess cost funds.

Special educational programs provided by the state and the school districts thereof for students with disabilities shall be extended to include students of preschool age. School districts shall be entitled to the regular apportionments from state and county school funds, as provided by law, and in addition to allocations from state excess cost funds made available for such special services for those students with disabilities who are given such special services.

[ 2007 c 115 s 9; (2007 c 115 s 8 expired September 1, 2009); 2006 c 269 s 3; 1995 c 77 s 13; 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.13.050. Prior: 1951 c 92 s 2; 1949 c 186 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4901-3. Formerly RCW 28A.13.050, 28.13.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2007 c 115 s 9: "Section 9 of this act takes effect September 1, 2009." [ 2007 c 115 s 17.]

Expiration date—2007 c 115 s 8: "Section 8 of this act expires September 1, 2009." [ 2007 c 115 s 16.]

Effective date—2006 c 269 s 3: "Section 3 of this act takes effect September 1, 2009." [ 2006 c 269 s 4.]

Finding—2006 c 269: See note following RCW 43.216.580.

Severability—Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 66: See notes following RCW 28A.155.010.